Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB47.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 16 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "Task Force Model Program" means the United States
Immigration and Customs Enforcement program that authorizes state and local
law enforcement officers to enforce limited immigration authority while
performing routine police duties established under Section 287(g) of the
Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. sec. 1357.
(2) (a) Each department post shall enter into a written agreement with the United
States Immigration and Customs Enforcement to participate in the Task
Force Model Program.
(b) Each officer in the department who participates in the Task Force Model
Program shall be required to complete forty (40) hours of training.
Section 2. KRS 15.404 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any peace officers employed or appointed after December 1, 1998, who have
not successfully completed basic training at a school certified or recognized
by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, shall within one (1) year of their
appointment or employment, successfully complete a basic training course, as
established by KRS 15.440, at a school certified or recognized by the
Kentucky Law Enforcement Council or receive a basic training credit
approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council under KRS
15.440(1)(d)6.
(b) In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of an officer that
prevent the officer from completing basic training within one (1) year, the
commissioner of the department or his or her designee may grant the officer
an extension of time, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days, in which to
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 12/15/2025 11:25 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1139
complete the training.
(c) Any peace officer who fails to successfully complete basic training within the
specified time periods, including extensions, shall lose his or her law
enforcement powers and his or her precertification status shall lapse. Further,
the peace officer shall be prohibited from serving as a peace officer for a
period of one (1) year from the date that his or her precertification lapses.
(2) (a) All peace officers with active certification status shall successfully complete
forty (40) hours of annual in-service training that has been certified or
recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, that is appropriate to
the officer's rank and responsibility and the size and location of his
department.
(b) 1. Any peace officer with active certification status who is employed by a
law enforcement agency that has executed a written agreement with
the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement to
participate in the Task Force Model Program established under
Section 287(g) of the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. sec.
1357, who successfully completes the mandatory training provided by
the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement 287(g)
Immigration Authority Delegation Program shall be deemed by the
Kentucky Law Enforcement Council to have met the annual forty (40)
hours of in-service training required by paragraph (a) of this
subsection in the year the officer initially completes the training.
2. The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall certify the United
States Immigration and Customs Enforcement 287(g) Immigration
Authority Delegation Program as an approved in-service training
program that qualifies toward the annual forty (40) hours of in-service
training requirement established in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 12/15/2025 11:25 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1139
(c) In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of an officer that
prevent the officer from completing the in-service training within one (1)
year, the commissioner of the department or his or her designee may grant the
officer an extension of time, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days, in
which to complete the training. If the officer is unable to complete the in-
service training due to injury or illness that prevents him or her from working
as a peace officer, the one hundred eighty (180) day extension shall begin on
the date that the officer returns to work.
(d)[(c)] Any peace officer who fails to successfully complete in-service training
within the specified time periods, including extensions, shall lose his or her
law enforcement powers and his or her certification status shall be changed to
training deficiency status.
(e)[(d)] When a peace officer is deficient in required training, the commissioner
of the department or his or her designee shall notify the council, which shall
notify the peace officer and his or her agency.
(f) 1.[(e)] The requirements of this subsection shall be waived for the period
of time that a peace officer is serving on active duty in the United States
Armed Forces.
2.[(f)] This waiver shall be retroactive for peace officers from the date of
September 11, 2001.
(3) An officer who has lost his or her law enforcement powers due solely to his or her
failure to meet the in-service training requirements of this section may regain his or
her certification status and law enforcement powers upon successful completion of
the training deficiency.
(4) (a) Any constable who is elected may apply for admission to a basic training
course, as established by KRS 15.440, at a school certified or recognized by
the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council. The constable shall meet all
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 12/15/2025 11:25 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1139
precertification requirements established pursuant to KRS 15.382 for
attendance. The constable shall bear all costs associated with precertification.
The constable shall bear all costs associated with completion of the basic
training course, except the costs of basic training at a course established
pursuant to KRS 15.340.
(b) The basic training course shall accept the constable for basic training so long
as:
1. The constable meets the precertification requirements; and
2. The basic training course has the training capacity to instruct the
constable.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 12/15/2025 11:25 AM Jacketed